Georgia, session 2025_26, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Chapter 5 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to programs and
10 protection for children, is amended in Code Section 49-5-41, relating to persons and agencies
11 permitted access to records, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
12 "(h) As used in this Code section, the term 'foster parent' shall have the same meaning as
13 in Code Section 49-5-281."
H. B. 256
- 1 -

25 LC 48 1421
14 SECTION 2.
15 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 49-5-281, relating to bill of rights
16 for foster parents and grievances for violations, as follows:
17 "49-5-281.
18 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
19 (1) 'Certified volunteer advocate' means an individual approved as a volunteer advocate
20 by the Office of the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children.
21 (2) 'Fictive kin' shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 15-11-2.
22 (3) 'Foster parent' means foster parents, relative caregivers, and fictive kin who provide
23 care for children in the custody of the Division of Family and Children Services of the
24 Department of Human Services.
25 (4) 'Reasonable and prudent parent standard' shall have the same meaning as in Code
26 Section 49-5-3.
27 (5) 'Relative caregiver' means a grandparent, great-grandparent, aunt, uncle, great aunt,
28 great uncle, cousin, sibling, stepparent, or stepsibling who has assumed responsibility for
29 raising a child in an informal, noncustodial, or guardianship capacity.
30 (b) The General Assembly finds that foster parents providing care for children who are in
31 the custody of the Department of Human Services play an integral, indispensable, and vital
32 role in the state's effort to care for dependent children displaced from their homes. The
33 General Assembly further finds that it is in the best interest of Georgia's child welfare
34 system to acknowledge foster parents these caregivers as active and participating members
35 of this system and to support them through the following bill of rights for foster parents
36 who care for children in the custody of the Department of Human Services through direct
37 approval and placement by the department:
38 (1) The right to be treated by the Division of Family and Children Services of the
39 Department of Human Services and other partners in the care of abused children with
H. B. 256
- 2 -

25 LC 48 1421
40 dignity, respect, and trust as a primary provider of foster care and a member of the
41 professional team caring for foster children children in foster care;
42 (2) The right not to be discriminated against on the basis of religion, race, color, creed,
43 gender, marital status, national origin, age, or physical handicap;
44 (3) The right to continue with his or her own family values and beliefs, so long as the
45 values and beliefs of the foster child and the birth family are not infringed upon and
46 consideration is given to the special needs of children who have experienced trauma and
47 separation from their families. This shall include the right to exercise parental authority
48 within the limits of policies, procedures, and other directions of the Division of Family
49 and Children Services and within the limits of the laws of the State of Georgia;
50 (3.1) The right to use a reasonable and prudent parent standard when determining the
51 ability of a child in foster care to engage in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, social,
52 or skill-building activities;
53 (4) The right to receive both standardized pre-service training, including training in
54 Division of Family and Children Services policies and procedures and appropriate
55 ongoing training, by the Division of Family and Children Services or the placing
56 child-placing agency at appropriate intervals to meet mutually assessed needs of the child
57 and to improve foster parents' skills and to apprise foster parents of any changes in
58 policies and procedures of the Division of Family and Children Services and any changes
59 in applicable law;
60 (5) The right to be apprised of, and to seek out from independent sources, information,
61 laws, and guidelines on the obligations, responsibilities, and opportunities of foster
62 parenting and to be kept informed of any changes in laws, policies, and procedures
63 regarding foster parenting by the Division of Family and Children Services in a timely
64 manner and at least annually;
65 (6) The right to receive timely financial reimbursement according to the agreement
66 between the foster parents and the Department of Human Services from funds
H. B. 256
- 3 -

25 LC 48 1421
67 appropriated by the General Assembly and to be notified of any costs or expenses for
68 which the foster parent may be eligible for reimbursement;
69 (7) The right to receive information from the Division of Family and Children Services
70 on how to receive services and reach personnel 24 hours per day, seven days per week;
71 (8) The right prior to the placement of a child to be notified of any issues relative to the
72 child that may jeopardize the health and safety of the foster family or the child or alter
73 the manner in which foster care should be administered;
74 (9) The right to discuss information regarding the child prior to placement. The Division
75 of Family and Children Services will provide such information as it becomes available
76 as allowable under state and federal laws;
77 (10) The right to refuse placement of a child in the foster home or to request, upon
78 reasonable notice, the removal of a child from the foster home without fear of reprisal or
79 any adverse effect on being assigned any future foster or adoptive placements;
80 (11) The right to receive any information through the Division of Family and Children
81 Services regarding the number of times a foster child has been moved and the reasons
82 therefor; and to receive the names and phone numbers of the previous foster parents if the
83 previous foster parents have authorized such release and as allowable under state and
84 federal law;
85 (12) The right, at any time during which a child is placed with the foster parent, to
86 receive from the Division of Family and Children Services any and all additional
87 pertinent information relevant to the care of the child;
88 (13) The right to be provided with a written copy of the individual treatment and service
89 plan or case plan created pursuant to Code Section 15-11-201 concerning the child in the
90 foster parent's home and to discuss such plan with the case manager, as well as reasonable
91 notification of any changes to that plan;
H. B. 256
- 4 -

25 LC 48 1421
92 (14) The right to participate in the planning of visitation with the child and the child's
93 biological family with the foster parents recognizing that visitation with his or her
94 biological family is important to the child;
95 (15) The right to participate in the case planning and decision-making process with the
96 Division of Family and Children Services regarding the child as provided in Code Section
97 15-11-201;
98 (16) The right to provide input concerning the plan of services for the child and to have
99 that input considered by the department;
100 (17) The right to communicate for the purpose of participating in the case of the foster
101 child with other professionals who work with such child within the context of the
102 professional team, including, but not limited to, therapists, physicians, and teachers, as
103 allowable under state and federal law;
104 (18) The right to be notified in advance, in writing, by the Division of Family and
105 Children Services or the court of any hearing or review where the case plan or
106 permanency of the child is an issue, including initial and periodic reviews held by the
107 court in accordance with Code Section 15-11-216 or by the Judicial Citizen Review Panel
108 in accordance with Code Section 15-11-217, hearings following revocation of the license
109 of an agency which has permanent custody of a child in accordance with Code Section
110 31-2-6, and permanency plan hearings in accordance with Code Section 15-11-230;
111 (19) The right to be considered, where appropriate, as a preferential placement option
112 when a child who was formerly placed with the foster parents has reentered the foster
113 care system;
114 (20) The right to be considered, where appropriate, as the first choice as a permanent
115 parent or parents for a child who, after 12 months of placement in the foster home, is
116 released for adoption or permanent foster care;
117 (21) The right to be provided a fair and timely investigation of complaints concerning
118 the operation of a foster home;
H. B. 256
- 5 -

25 LC 48 1421
119 (22) The right to an explanation of a corrective action plan or policy violation relating
120 to foster parents; and
121 (23) The right, to the extent allowed under state and federal law, to have an advocate
122 present at all portions of investigations of abuse and neglect at which an accused foster
123 parent is present. Child abuse and neglect investigations shall be investigated pursuant
124 to Division of Family and Children Services policies and procedures, and any removal
125 of a foster child shall be conducted pursuant to those policies and procedures. The
126 Division of Family and Children Services will permit volunteers with the Adoptive and
127 Foster Parent Association of Georgia to be educated concerning the procedures relevant
128 to investigations of alleged abuse and neglect and the rights of accused foster parents.
129 After such training, a volunteer will be permitted to serve as an advocate for an accused
130 foster parent. The right to be provided a fair, timely, and impartial investigation of
131 complaints concerning the foster parent's licensure, to be provided the opportunity to
132 have a certified volunteer advocate of the foster parent's choosing present during the
133 investigation, and to be provided due process during the investigation; the right to be
134 provided the opportunity to request and receive mediation or an administrative review of
135 decisions that affect licensing parameters, or both mediation and an administrative
136 review; and the right to have decisions concerning a licensing corrective action plan
137 specifically explained and cited to the licensing standards violated. All communication
138 received by the certified volunteer advocate in this capacity shall be strictly confidential.;
139 (24) The right to request that a certified volunteer advocate be present at all meetings
140 with the department where the foster parent is present, including, but not limited to,
141 individual treatment and service planning, administrative hearings, the grievance and
142 mediation process, the adoption process, and any meetings relating to an allegation
143 process. All communication received by the certified volunteer advocate in this capacity
144 shall be strictly confidential;
H. B. 256
- 6 -

25 LC 48 1421
145 (25) The right to be free from retaliation or discrimination based upon the filing of any
146 complaint or grievance with the Division of Family and Children Services; and
147 (26) The right to seek and obtain independent legal advice and counsel regarding the
148 foster parent's status.
149 (b)(c) This bill of rights shall be given full consideration when Division of Family and
150 Children Services policies regarding foster care and adoptive placement are developed.
151 (c)(d) Foster parents who care for children in the custody of the Department of Human
152 Services through direct approval and placement by the department shall have the right to
153 file a grievance in response to any violation of this article, which shall be such foster
154 parents' exclusive administrative remedy for any violation of this article. The Division of
155 Family and Children Services and the Office of the Child Advocate for the Protection of
156 Children, along with an advisory committee comprised in part of representatives from the
157 Adoptive and Foster Parent Association of Georgia, who provide private placements foster
158 parent advocacy organizations will develop a grievance procedure, including a mediation
159 procedure and an administrative procedure, to be published in departmental policy manuals
160 and the Foster Parent Handbook no later than July 1, 2005 2025.
161 (d)(e) The General Assembly further finds that it is also in the best interest of Georgia's
162 child welfare system for the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department
163 of Human Services to recognize the bill of rights, with reasonable modifications made to
164 adapt the provisions as required to make them applicable to private agencies, by
165 incorporating them into contracts with private agencies serving children in the custody of
166 the Department of Human Services. The Department of Human Services shall, by contract,
167 require that providers, with whom it contracts for the placement of children in its custody,
168 give full consideration to the rights in subsection (a) (b) of this Code section in developing
169 their policies, practices, and procedures regarding foster care and adoptive placement. The
170 department shall provide information needed by the contractors to meet the requirements
171 of this subsection in a timely manner.
H. B. 256
- 7 -

25 LC 48 1421
172 (e)(f) The Department of Human Services, in consultation with appropriate provider
173 associations and the Adoptive and Foster Parent Association of Georgia foster parent
174 advocacy organizations, shall develop a grievance procedure for dealing with any
175 grievances their foster parents have in response to any violation of this article, no later than
176 July 1, 2007 2025. The department shall enforce this provision through policies and
177 procedures and through its contracts with providers."
178 SECTION 3.
179 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
180 without such approval.
181 SECTION 4.
182 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 256
- 8 -